Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-3411
Notice, delivery, acceptance, consideration
not required.

A
transfer on death deed is effective without:

(1) Notice
or delivery to or acceptance by the designated beneficiary during the transferor's
life; or

(2) Consideration.

Laws 2012, LB536, § 11.